Final source/morphy/foma/Noun-Neut_FrontMidVowel.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols N +RT +SG +DF +NOM +CJ +NOM +ACC +ID +FN +VOC +PL +DAT +GEN +ABL 
LEXICON Root
NounNeutFrontMidVowelStem;

LEXICON NounNeutFrontMidVowel


+N+RT: #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM: #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC: #;
+N+RT+PL+VOC: #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:ය #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC:ය #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+VOC:ය #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM+CJ:යත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+CJ:යත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+NOM:යයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ACC+FN:යයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:යක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC:යක් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM:යකුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+CJ:යකුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+NOM+FN:යකි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ACC+FN:යකි #;
+N+RT+PL+NOM+CJ:ත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+CJ:ත් #
+N+RT+PL+NOM+FN:යි #;
+N+RT+PL+ACC+FN:යි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT:යෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL:යෙන් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+CJ:යෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+CJ:යෙනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+INT+FN:යෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+ABL+FN:යෙනි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT:යකින් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL:යකින් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT:යකිනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+CJ:යකිනුත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+INT+FN:යකිනි
+N+RT+SG+ID+ABL+FN:යකිනි #;
+N+RT+PL+INT:වලින් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL:වලින් #;
+N+RT+PL+INT+CJ:වලිනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+ABL+CJ:වලිනුත් #;
+N+RT+PL+INT+FN:වලිනි
+N+RT+PL+ABL+FN:වලිනි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT:යට #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+CJ:යටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+DAT+FN:යටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT:යකට #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+CJ:යකටත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+DAT+FN:යකටයි #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT:වලට #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+CJ:වලටත් #;
+N+RT+PL+DAT+FN:වලටයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:යේ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:යේත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:යේයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN:යෙ #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+CJ:යෙත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+GEN+FN:යෙයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN:යක #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC:යක #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+CJ:යකත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC+CJ:යකත් #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+GEN+FN:යකයි #;
+N+RT+SG+ID+LOC+FN:යකයි #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN:වල #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC:වල #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+CJ:වලත් #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC+CJ:වලත් #;
+N+RT+PL+GEN+FN:වලයි #;
+N+RT+PL+LOC+FN:වලයි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC:යෙහි #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC+CJ:යෙහිත් #;
+N+RT+SG+DF+LOC+FN:යෙහියි #;

LEXICON NounNeutFrontMidVowelStem
අනුග්‍රාහකත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වගාරක්ෂණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පුරාවෘත්ත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ගණකාධිකරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
විලයන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ශ්‍රෝත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නිබන්ධ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ද්විමාසික	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පරාවර්තක	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ධර්මායතන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පෝර්ම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වර්ධන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
යථාවබෝධ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අත්පටි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඇස්තමේන්තුකරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මයික්‍රෆෝන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ශල්‍යකර්ම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ගුදිරි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අන්තර්ජාල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සුරක්ෂිතභාව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මහවැලි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
චුම්බකත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දෙපාර්ශ්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
විචලන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
යාත්‍රාංගණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
යාකරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රන්මාල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ස්ථාන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වාර්ගිකත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වටප්‍රමාණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අප්‍රසිද්ධි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
තාලි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සංඥාර්ථවේද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සහෝදරත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දුරදක්න	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ව්‍යවච්ජේද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අවවාද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වයලීන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
හිතකාමිත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සුනඛාවලෝකන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රඥප්ති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අභියාචනාධිකරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පට	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නඩ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කලාප	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අශිෂ්ඨාචාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සංකේන්ද්‍රණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ෆැසිස්ට්වාද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වාක්‍යාවසාන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රෝගකාරක	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කිලෝමීටර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නයනාභරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
යගුළි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ක්‍රියාකාරීත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රචණ්ඩත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මයිල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ආස්වාදන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අන්තර්දෘෂ්ටි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සෑදල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සමුච්ච	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පරිශ්‍රම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ආභරණාගාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මුංඇට	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පවාරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
හැට්ට	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පුද්ගලත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දියමන්ති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සන්සුන්භාව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අංශභාග	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රකාරාංශ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රතිලාභ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සාසන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රාජධානි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දක්න	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පරිච	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පරිවරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සිනමාවේද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අවදි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නවජීවන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වතුයා	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දෝලන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අභ්‍යවකාශ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සංඝරත්න	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වයර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මංගල්ල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
විචාරක්‍රම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ආයාත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඝට්ටන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මෘදුභාව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නිවස්න	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අග්‍රස්ථාන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ව්‍යාප්ති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අතරවාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
විශ්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කුණප	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
යන්ත්‍රාල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අනුමැති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වනාන්තර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ශබ්දවාහිනි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
විදුලිජනන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සබකෝල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සත්‍ය	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ශෝකාන්ත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ආරක්ෂණවාද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රදාන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රේක්ෂණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සංක්‍රමණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නගර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අලංකාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රතිමූර්ති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ද්‍රාවණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රහර්ෂ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රබන්ධ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සාහිත්‍ය	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ස්වාභාවිකත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ස්වාධීනත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වර්ගවාදිත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ව්‍යවසන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මැදිරි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
විකේන්ද්‍රණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වර්ගීකරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මහාමාර්ග	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පුරෝකථන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
විනෝදාස්වාදන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රාග	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අර්ථශාස්ත්‍ර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රයිෆල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පාවාඩ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අනුප්‍රාප්ති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
බූලී	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඇන්හයිඩ්‍රයිඩ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කෝරල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ශ්‍රෝණි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අභ්යාවකාශ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඉතිරිවූ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කහපැහැ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ගංගාරම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ටුම්බි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දෙකෝරළ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පදනම්වූ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්රචදේශ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මධ්‍යහන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රාත්‍රිකාල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වශේෂ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ව්යාකපාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සත්කෝරල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සාමාන්යම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සේරි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පෙබරවාරි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ග්‍රීන්ලන්ත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වාෂ්පිකරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රාමායණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
උච්චාරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
උදරාබාධ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පේ‍්‍රක්‍ෂකාගාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වාෂ්පීකරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අටසිය	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ආණ්ඩුපක්‍ෂ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කරවූ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ගැටපද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
තාපසාරාම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නීීති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පේකඩ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
බුහුමාන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
යතුරුලියන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වැයශීර්ෂ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ශ්‍රෙණි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සාමාන්යද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
හෘදයාබාද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අභිධර්ම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පරිඝණක	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
හැරමිටි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ක්‍රීඩාපිටි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මාර්‍ග	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අස්ථායිතාව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කෘෂිකාර්මාන්ත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඡ්‍යොතිෂ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පරාගණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රවාහණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රූපලාවන්‍ය	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සංව්ධාන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දායකත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පද්දති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
බයිබල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ස්භාව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කුලභේද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නාට්‍යකරණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මින්නේරි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සමූලඝාතන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ශික්ෂණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
උපදේශකත්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
භෝජන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කළල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ක්‍රියවලි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වැඩසිටි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දුර්ගන්ධ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
උෂ්ණත්‍ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඇබැද්දි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ව්‍යාංජන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කාලාන්තර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පිටක	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ශාසන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ෆාමසි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ද්වාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වාත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රූපාකාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
යෝජනාක්‍රම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කණ්නාඩි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නාමාවලි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ස්ථූප	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පරිච්ඡේද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ලවණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්රදේශ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
තාක්ෂණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඕවර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පන්තිකාමර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
විප්ලව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කැටායන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පක්‍ෂ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රවාහන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කළගෙඩි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කලන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පදිංචි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඉංග්‍රිසි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කෙළි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
දෝති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කාලපරිච්ඡේද	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඝාත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
චමත්කාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
රයිෆල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ආසාදන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කොට්ඨාස	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මර්මස්ථාන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ප්‍රාරම්භ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කැපිලි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පුස්කොල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සැටි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ව්‍යාපෘති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
තිරිංග	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පාර්ශ්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ආහාර	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ගර්ව	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
නාම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
උපදේශ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
බලාසිටි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
වික්‍රම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මධ්‍යස්ථ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
පට්ටල	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
මාන	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ඇමරිකාවේ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
ටිකම	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
බවති	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
සංක‍්‍රමණ	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
අපැහැදිලි	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
භයානක	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
කියන්නට	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
හේමන්ත	NounNeutFrontMidVowel;
